Utah statutes.
53B-2-110.   Utah Valley University -- Institutional name change.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 2008, Utah Valley State College shall be known as Utah Valley University.

(2)  The university is a continuation of Utah Valley State College and shall:

(a)  possess all rights, title, privileges, powers, immunities, franchises, endowments, property, and claims of the college; and

(b)  fulfill and perform all obligations of the college, including obligations relating to outstanding bonds and notes.

